Massachusetts, session 194th, S2057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 38B the 
following section:- 
Section 38B½. The committee on ways and means of each branch of the general court 
shall conduct no less than 3 public hearings on bills referred to them that purport to establish, 
increase or expand any new or existing taxes or fees. The committees shall give 14 days’ public 
notice prior to holding such public hearings. Each meeting shall be conducted in different cities 
in three distinct geographical regions of the commonwealth. One meeting shall be conducted in 
the City of Boston, one in the City of Worcester, and one in the City of Springfield.